Idaho, session 2026, H0965.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of Species, Minerals, and Energy
Coordination for the State Historic Preservation Office Program the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from
the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $204,500 $52,900 $257,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 150,000 150,000
Federal Grant
Fund 1,067,300 125,000 $100,000 1,292,300
TOTAL $1,271,800 $327,900 $100,000 $1,699,700
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Office of Species, Minerals, and Energy Coordination is hereby in-
creased by twelve (12.00) for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision provided by law, the ap-
propriation to the Idaho State Historical Society is hereby reduced by the


following amounts from the designated expense classes from the listed funds
for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $204,500 $52,900 $257,400
Federal Grant
Fund 1,067,300 275,000 $100,000 1,442,300
TOTAL $1,271,800 $327,900 $100,000 $1,699,700
SECTION 4. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Idaho State Historical Society is hereby reduced by twelve (12.00) for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. EXEMPTION FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITA-
TIONS. The Office of Species, Minerals, and Energy Coordination is hereby
exempt from the provisions of Section 67-3511 (1) and (2), Idaho Code, allow-
ing unlimited transfers between expense classes and between programs, for
all moneys appropriated to them for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to
another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.